Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑13] Agent's liability. An
agent that violates this chapter shall be liable to the principal or the
principal's successors in interest for the amount required to:

(1) Restore the value of the principal's property to
what it would have been had the violation not occurred; and

(2) Reimburse the principal or the principal's
successors in interest for the attorney's fees and costs paid on the agent's
behalf. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next